Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB44.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 158 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) As used in this section, "anti-choking device" means a portable suction device
used to remove an airway obstruction during a choking emergency that has been
registered as a Class II medical device with the United States Food and Drug
Administration.
(2) If a school acquires an anti-choking device, it shall ensure that all school
cafeteria personnel and any other expected users of the device receive training in:
(a) The Heimlich maneuver; and
(b) Accordance with the manufacturer's instructions for assembly and use of
the device.
(3) Any person or entity who, in good faith and without remuneration or the
expectation of remuneration, renders emergency care or treatment by use of an
anti-choking device or the Heimlich maneuver on public or private school
property or while attending a school-sponsored event shall be immune from civil
liability for any personal injury as a result of the care or treatment, or as a result
of any act or failure to act in providing or arranging further medical treatment,
where the person acts as an ordinary, reasonable prudent person would have
acted under the same or similar circumstances.
(4) The administration of emergency care or treatment in subsection (3) of this
section by employees or contractors of a board of education, outside of a location
within a school building where medical care is typically rendered, shall not be
considered to be rendered for remuneration or with the expectation of
remuneration because the employees or contractors perform medical care as part
of their regular professional or work responsibilities.
Page 1 of 2
BR013300.100 - 133 - XXXX 2/12/2025 3:10 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 133
(5) The immunity from civil liability for any personal injury under subsections (3)
and (4) of this section includes the person or entity who provides the anti-choking
device and the person or entity responsible for the site where the anti-choking
device is located.
(6) The immunity from civil liability under subsections (3) and (4) of this section
does not apply if the personal injury results from the gross negligence or willful
or wanton misconduct of the person rendering the emergency care.
Section 2. This Act may be cited as Landon's Law.
Page 2 of 2
BR013300.100 - 133 - XXXX 2/12/2025 3:10 PM Jacketed